Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE.new text end new text begin $796,544,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $796,544,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for operations and maintenance of the University of Minnesota. new text end